Washington, session 2025-2026, HB1461.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:Sec. 1. RCW 43.52.560 and 2015 c 73 s 1 are each amended to read as follows:Except as provided otherwise in this chapter, a joint operating agency shall purchase any item or items of materials, equipment, or supplies, the estimated cost of which is more than ((fifteen thousand dollars))$30,000 exclusive of sales tax, or order work for construction of generating projects and associated facilities, the estimated cost of which is more than ((twenty-five thousand dollars))$150,000 exclusive of sales tax if more than a single craft or trade is involved, or $75,500 exclusive of sales tax if only a single craft or trade is involved, by contract in accordance with RCW 54.04.070 and 54.04.080, which require sealed bids for contracts.--- END ---